Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-12,103
Custody; who entitled.

If a state agency caused an abandoned motorboat described in subdivision (1)(d) of section 37-1299 to be removed from public property, the state agency shall be entitled to custody of the motorboat. If a state agency caused an abandoned motorboat described in subdivision (1)(a), (b), or (c) of section 37-1299 to be removed from public property, the state agency shall deliver the motorboat to the local authority which shall have custody. The local authority entitled to custody of an abandoned motorboat shall be the county in which the motorboat was abandoned or, if abandoned in a city or village, the city or village in which the motorboat was abandoned.

Laws 2004, LB 560, § 16.